src/fst/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON ij
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON Interjections
гэ ij ;  !""
кэ ij ;  !""
де ij ;  !""
оде ij ;  !""
о ij ;  !""
оё ij ;  !""
чэ ij ;  !""
бэ̄-бэ̄ ij ;  !""
ма-ма ij ;  !""
мо̄ду:мо%{ː%}ду ij ;  !""
па ij ;  !""
иӈине̄:иӈине%{ː%} ij ;  !""
ке̄муре:ке%{ː%}муре ij ;  !""
харуне̄:харуне%{ː%} ij ;  !""
учуне̄:учуне%{ː%} ij ;  !""
хивине̄:хивине%{ː%} ij ;  !""
дэмэре̄:дэмэре%{ː%} ij ;  !""
